Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.280

Authority to command assistance.

Every such peace officer or other person empowered to make the arrest, shall have the same authority, in arresting the accused, to command assistance therein, as peace officers have by law in the execution of any criminal process directed to them, with like penalties against those who refuse their assistance.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 9.]